Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-114
County bonds; payment; cancellation at maturity; procedure; expenses.

When any registered bonds mature, they shall be paid off by the county treasurer at the place where payable out of any money in his or her hands or under his or her control for that purpose, and when so paid the bonds shall be endorsed Canceled by the county treasurer on the face thereof, together with the date of payment, and filed with the county clerk, who shall enter satisfaction of such bonds. If the bonds are payable out of the state, an allowance of one-fourth of one percent shall be made to the county treasurer for the expense attendant in making such payment, to be deducted from any money in his or her hands remaining after payment of such matured bonds.

Laws 1875, § 9, p. 172;

R.S.1913, § 379;

C.S.1922, § 296;

C.S.1929, § 11-115;

R.S.1943, § 10-114;

Laws 1990, LB 924, § 1.